Maryland, session 2026, SB0681.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Alcoholic Beverages and Cannabis
33–102.
This title applies only in Worcester County.
33–202.
(a) The Governor shall appoint [three] FIVE members to the Board, subject to the
advice and consent of the Senate.
(b) Each member of the Board shall be:
(1) a resident and voter of the county; and
(2) an individual of high character and integrity and of recognized business
capacity.
(c) (1) The term of a member is 4 years.
– 1 –

Ch. 839 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(2) The terms of the members are staggered as required by the terms
provided for members of the Board on [July 1, 2016] JUNE 1, 2026.
(d) (1) The Governor shall appoint an eligible individual to fill a vacancy
during the remainder of the term of office of the individual originally appointed in
accordance with subsection (a) of this section.
(2) A member who is appointed after a term has begun serves only for the
remainder of the term and until a successor is appointed and qualifies.
(e) (1) The Governor may remove a member for misconduct in office,
incompetence, or willful neglect of duty.
(2) The Governor shall give a member who is charged a copy of the charges
against the member and, with at least 10 days’ notice, an opportunity to be heard publicly
in person or by counsel.
(3) If a member is removed, the Governor shall file with the Office of the
Secretary of State a statement of charges against the member and the Governor’s findings
on the charges.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That:
(a) The terms of the three members of the Board of License Commissioners for
Worcester County who are in office on the effective date of this Act shall expire as follows:
(1) the term of the one member whose term is scheduled to expire on June
30, 2027, shall expire on June 30, 2027; and
(2) the term of the two members whose terms are scheduled to expire on
June 30, 2029, shall expire on June 30, 2029.
(b) The initial terms of the two additional members of the Board of License
Commissioners for Worcester County, as enacted by Section 1 of this Act, shall begin July
1, 2026.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect June
1, 2026.
Approved by the Governor, May 26, 2026.
– 2 –